District of Columbia statutes.
7-742.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“CFBR” means the Cottage Food Business Registry within the Department of Health.

(2)

“Cottage food business” means a business that:

(A)

Produces or packages cottage food products in a residential kitchen;

(B)

Sells the cottage food products in accordance with § 7-742.02 and regulations adopted by the Department of Health;

(C)

Has annual revenues from the sale of cottage food products in an amount not exceeding $ 25,000; and

(D)

Has obtained a home occupancy permit from the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs pursuant to section 203 of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (11 DCMR Section 203).

(3)

“Cottage food product” means a non-potentially hazardous food, as specified in regulations adopted by the Department of Health, that is sold at a farmer's market or public event in accordance with § 7-742.02 and regulations adopted by the Department of Health.

(4)

“Department” means the Department of Health.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4931
as added Jan. 25, 2014, D.C. Law 20-63, § 2, 60 DCR 16530
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-63, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-63 added this section.
2001 Ed., § 7-749.01.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-63: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-63, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, § 7003, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-63: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-63 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.